Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-913
Department; person who commits domestic abuse; programs and services.

The department shall provide such programs and services as it deems appropriate for the person who commits domestic abuse.

Laws 1978, LB 623, § 13.